Arkansas, session 2025, SB10.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 1, Subchapter 6, is amended
to add additional sections to read as follows:
14-1-607. Arkansas Natural Resources Commission to monitor impact of
blockchain networks and digital asset mining on water usage — Rules.
*ANS079*
12/13/2024 2:09:25 PM ANS079

SB10
The Arkansas Natural Resources Commission:
(1) Shall monitor the impact of blockchain networks and digital
asset mining on water usage in this state;
(2) May take action under § 15-22-204 against a blockchain
network or a digital asset mining business if the impact of the blockchain
network or digital asset mining business threatens the critical groundwater
supplies of this state through an excessive use of water; and
(3)(A) Shall promulgate rules to implement this section.
(B) A proposed rule by the commission promulgated under
this section shall be approved by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee under § 10-3-309.

14-1-608. Arkansas Public Service Commission to monitor impact of
blockchain networks and digital asset mining on electric grid — Rules.
The Arkansas Public Service Commission:
(1) Shall monitor the impact of blockchain networks and digital
asset mining on the electric grid;
(2) May direct a utility to halt service to a blockchain network
or digital asset mining business if the impact of the blockchain network or
digital asset mining business threatens the reliability of the electric grid;
and
(3)(A) Shall promulgate rules to implement this section.
(B) A proposed rule by the commission promulgated under
this section shall be approved by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee under § 10-3-309.











12/13/2024 2:09:25 PM